Massachusetts, session 194th, H3856.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 4, by striking out the figure ‘$4,000’ and inserting in
place thereof the figure ‘$7,000’.
Said section 8 of said chapter 115, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 6, the figure ‘$5,000’ and inserting in place thereof the figure ‘$8,000’.
of 1